Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.120

Election method is alternative.

The method of annexation provided for in RCW 35.13.020 to 35.13.110 shall be an alternative method, not superseding any other.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.13.120. Prior: 1937 c 110 s 2; 1907 c 245 s 6; RRS s 8901.]